Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3217
Private foundations and split-interest trusts; applicability of sections.

A trustee of a trust which is a private foundation or a split-interest trust as defined in section 30-3215, may elect that sections 30-3215 to 30-3218 shall not apply to such trust and its trustee or trustees by so notifying the Attorney General in writing within six months following April 30, 1971, or when such trust becomes subject to sections 30-3215 to 30-3218, whichever last occurs. Section 30-3215 shall not apply to any trust with respect to which notice has been given, unless the trust is amended to comply with the terms of section 30-3215.

Laws 1971, LB 793, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-636.